Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB498.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 21A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The General Assembly respectfully requests that the Supreme Court of Kentucky
institute a pilot project to study the feasibility and desirability of the use of
artificial intelligence for transcription services in court proceedings.
(2) (a) The pilot project may be established in a minimum of three (3) diverse
judicial districts or judicial circuits or a division or divisions thereof chosen
by the Chief Justice.
(b) A pilot project authorized by this subsection shall not be established in a
judicial district or judicial circuit or a division thereof when objected to by
the applicable judge.
(3) The pilot project shall:
(a) Require participating courts to use artificial intelligence for transcription
services in court proceedings;
(b) Last for four (4) years, unless extended or limited by the General Assembly;
(c) Be monitored and evaluated by the Administrative Office of the Courts to
determine:
1. Whether there are adverse effects resulting from the use of artificial
intelligence for transcription services in court proceedings;
2. Whether the pilot project demonstrates a benefit to the litigants;
3. Whether the pilot project demonstrates a benefit to the public, with
particular regard to:
a. Whether the program results in a cost savings to the courts; and
b. Whether the program results in improved efficiency in court
operations;
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/12/2025 2:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1663
4. Whether the pilot project supports a determination that artificial
intelligence should be used for transcription services in court
proceedings;
5. The parameters and limits of the program;
6. Suggestions for the operation and improvement of the program;
7. Rules changes which may be needed if the program is to be made
permanent and expanded to all courts; and
8. Recommendations for statutory changes which may be needed if the
program is to be made permanent and expanded to all courts.
(4) The Administrative Office of the Courts:
(a) Shall provide an annual report to the Legislative Research Commission for
referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Judiciary by September 1 of each
year the program is in operation with statistics, findings, and
recommendations; and
(b) May make periodic progress reports and statistical reports and provide
suggestions to the Legislative Research Commission when determined
necessary by the Chief Justice.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/12/2025 2:43 PM Jacketed